Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 427.13, as


last amended by Section 25, Chapter 182, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 427.13), is amended to read as follows:


Section 427.13. A. All medical marijuana and medical marijuana


products shall be purchased solely from a state-licensed medical


marijuana business, and shall not be purchased from any out-of-state


providers.


B. 1. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority shall have


oversight and auditing responsibilities to ensure that all marijuana


being grown in this state is accounted for and shall implement an


inventory tracking system. Pursuant to these duties, the Authority

Req. No. 269 Page 1


shall require that each medical marijuana business, medical


marijuana research facility, medical marijuana education facility


and medical marijuana waste disposal facility keep records for every


transaction with another medical marijuana business, patient or


caregiver. Inventory shall be tracked and updated after each


individual sale and reported to the Authority.


2. The inventory tracking system licensees use shall allow for


integration of other seed-to-sale systems and, at a minimum, shall


include the following:


a. notification of when marijuana seeds and clones are


planted,


b. notification of when marijuana plants are harvested


and destroyed,


c. notification of when marijuana is transported, sold,


stolen, diverted or lost,


d. a complete inventory of all marijuana, seeds, plant


tissue, clones, plants, usable marijuana or trim,


leaves and other plant matter, batches of extract, and


marijuana concentrates,


e. all samples sent to a testing laboratory, an unused


portion of a sample returned to a licensee, all


samples utilized by licensee for purposes of


negotiating a sale, and


f. all samples used for quality testing by a licensee.

Req. No. 269 Page 2


3. Each medical marijuana business, medical marijuana research


facility, medical marijuana education facility and medical marijuana


waste disposal facility shall develop written standard operating


procedures outlining the manner in which it operates as prescribed


by the Authority and shall use a seed-to-sale tracking system or


integrate its own seed-to-sale tracking system with the seed-to-sale


tracking system established by the Authority in accordance with the


limitations set forth herein.


4. These records shall include, but not be limited to, the


following:


a. the name and license number of the medical marijuana


business that cultivated, manufactured or sold the


medical marijuana or medical marijuana product,


b. the address and phone number of the medical marijuana


business that cultivated, manufactured or sold the


medical marijuana or medical marijuana product,


c. the type of product received during the transaction,


d. the batch number of the marijuana plant used,


e. the date of the transaction,


f. the total spent in dollars,


g. all point-of-sale records,


h. marijuana excise tax records, and





Req. No. 269 Page 3


i. any additional information as may be reasonably


required by the Executive Director of the Oklahoma


Medical Marijuana Authority.


5. All inventory tracking records retained by a medical


marijuana business, medical marijuana research facility, medical


marijuana education facility or medical marijuana waste disposal


facility containing medical marijuana patient or caregiver


information shall comply with all relevant state and federal laws


including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance Portability and


Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA).


C. The seed-to-sale inventory tracking system shall include:


1. A software infrastructure that provides maximum flexibility


for the exchange of data between the Authority and medical marijuana


business licensees;


2. Capabilities that allow the medical marijuana business


licensees to submit data to the Authority directly through an


application program interface (API), data interchange service tool,


or by other means or technology acceptable to the Authority;


3. Automated reporting for inventory and point of sale


discrepancies; and


4. Technology for payments, sales, and tax collection.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-269 CAD 1/16/2025 3:36:51 PM

Req. No. 269 Page 4